Massachusetts, session 194th, H1684.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 265 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after Section 59 the 
following section:- 
SECTION 60. FALSE POLICE CLAIMS RELATING TO A MEMBER OF THE 
PROTECTED CLASS; PENALTIES.  
SECTION 60. (a) Any person who intentionally selects a person or property for harm or 
causes damage to the property of another or causes physical injury or death to another or 
summons a police officer or peace officer without reason to suspect a violation of the penal law, 
any other criminal conduct, or an imminent threat to a person or property, in whole or in 
substantial part because of a belief or perception regarding the race, color, national origin, 

of 2 10 ancestry, gender, religion, religious practice, age, disability or sexual orientation of a person, 
regardless of whether the belief or perception is correct, shall be liable, in a civil action or 
proceeding maintained by such individual or group of individuals, for injunctive relief, damages, 
or any other appropriate relief in law or equity. If it shall appear to the satisfaction of the court or 
justice that the respondent has, in fact, violated this section, an injunction may be issued by such 
court or justice, enjoining and restraining any further violation, without requiring proof that any 
person has, in fact, been injured or damaged thereby. For the purposes of this subdivision, a 
person lacks reason to suspect a violation of the penal law, any other criminal conduct, or an 
imminent threat to a person or property where a reasonable person would not suspect such 
violation, conduct, or threat.